Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.230

Violations—Penalty.

Any owner knowing of the existence of any noxious weeds on the owner's land who fails to control such weeds in accordance with this chapter and rules and regulations in force pursuant thereto; or any person who enters upon any land in violation of an order in force pursuant to RCW 17.10.210; or any person who interferes with the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter has committed a civil infraction.

[ 1987 c 438 s 23; 1979 c 118 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 23.]